Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202023-1304
Official bonds; record; duty to keep.

The county clerk shall keep a book in which shall be entered in alphabetical order, by name of the principal, a minute of all official bonds filed in the county clerk's office, giving the name of the office, amount and date of bond, names of sureties, and date of filing, with proper reference to the book and page where the same is recorded.

Laws 1879, § 76, p. 375;

R.S.1913, § 5608;

C.S.1922, § 4927;

C.S.1929, § 26-1004;

R.S.1943, § 23-1304;

Laws 2018, LB786, § 1.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).